Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-837
Appropriations; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate no more than four million five hundred thousand dollars annually beginning in fiscal year 2025-26 from the General Fund for the purpose of the Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic Act.

Laws 2023, LB276, § 7.